bezhta.twol
Alphabet
	а ā б в г ē ж з и ӣ й к л м ō о п р с т у ӯ х ц ч ш ъ ь ӏ э ю я %- %>
	ᴴ:ᴴ
	ᴴ:0
	%>:0
	%{и%}:0
	%{и%}:и
	
	%{V%}:0
	%{V%}:о
	%{V%}:и
	%{V%}:а
	
	%{V2%}:0
	%{V2%}:о
	
	%{C%}:0
	%{C%}:л
	
	%{gen%}:с
	%{gen%}:ш
	
	%{UM%}:0
	%{UM%}:ь
	
	з:ж
	%{N%}:б
	%{N%}:м
	
	е:е
	е:э
	е:0
	а:0
	и:0
	
	н:н
	н:л
	
	д:б
	д:д
	с:ш
	
	о:0
	%{L%}:0
	%{L%}:и
	л:ц
	л:н
	т:ц
	т:д
	ӏ:0
;

Sets
!regular vowels	
  Vowels = а е и о у э ӣ ӯ ā ō ē;
!consonants
  Consonants = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т х ц ч ш;
!modifiers
  Mods = ь ъ ӏ;
! vowels that undergo nasalisation
  Nasalyzed = а е и о у ā ē ӣ ӯ;
Definitions

C = :Consonants [ :Mods ]*;
  
Rules

"vowel dropping in locative forms"
%{и%}:0 <=> _ (%>:) X ; where X in (г х к);

"vowel dropping in locative forms"
%{и%}:0 <=> _ %>: д о й;

"genI suffix realization с --> ш "
%{gen%}:ш <=> е %>: _ ;

"genI suffix realization с --> ш "
%{gen%}:ш <=> Vowels ь (%>:) _ ;

"lative suffix realization л --> ил"
%{V%}:и <=> л ӏ (%>:) _ л;

"lative suffix realization л --> ил"
%{V%}:и <=> [и | й] (%>:) (л) ъ (%>:) _ л;

"lative suffix realization л --> ил"
%{V%}:и <=> о (%>:) л ъ (%>:) _ л;

"lative suffix realization л --> ил"
%{V%}:и <=> ō (%>:) л ъ (%>:) _ л;

"lative suffix realization л --> ил"
%{V%}:и <=> л а (%{UM%}:) (%>:) л  ъ (%>:) _ л;

"lative suffix realization л --> ол"
%{V%}:о <=> о (%>:) ъ (%>:) _ л;

"lative suffix realization л --> ол"
%{V%}:о <=> ō (%>:) ъ (%>:) _ л;

"lative suffix realization л --> ал"
%{V%}:а <=> а (%{UM%}:) (%>:) ъ (%>:) _ л;

"ablative suffix realization с --> ис"
%{V%}:и <=> и (%>:) ъ (%>:) _ с; 

"ablative suffix realization с --> ос"
%{V%}:о <=> о (%>:) ъ (%>:) _ с; 

"ablative suffix realization с --> ас"
%{V%}:а <=> а (%>:) ъ (%>:) _ с;

"ablative suffix realization с --> ос"
%{V%}:о <=> ō (%>:) ъ (%>:) _ с; 

"ablative suffix realization с --> со"
%{V2%}:о <=> л X (%>:) (%{V%}:) с _ ; where X in Mods;

"translative suffix realization"
%{C%}:л <=> ь а (%{UM%}:) (%>:) _ к ь ā;

"translative suffix realization"
%{C%}:л <=> ъ а (%{UM%}:) (%>:) _ к ь ā;

"vowel harmony"
%{UM%}:ь <=> Vowels [:ь | ь:] [(%>:) X (%>:)]+ [ā | а | о | у] _  ; where X in C;

"с --> ш"
с:ш <=> :ь (%>:) _ ; и _ (%>:) е: ; е: _ (%>:) е: ; а _ (%>:) е: ; е %>: %{L%}: _ [.#. | %>:];

"ц --> ч"
ц:ч <=> и _ (ӏ:) (%>:) е: ; е: _ (ӏ:) (%>:) е: ; а _ (ӏ:) (%>:) е: ;

"з --> ж"
з:ж <=> и _ (%>:) е: ; е: _  (%>:) е: ; а _ (%>:) е: ;

"б --> м before nasalyzed"
%{N%}:м <=> .#. _ (%>:) Nasalyzed (ь) ᴴ: ;

"nasalisation drop"
ᴴ:0 <=> .#. :м (%>:) Vowels (ь) _;

"е --> э"
е:э <=> .#. _ ;

"н --> л before л" !Comrie et al. 2015 p. 100
н:л <=>  _ (%>:) л;
	except
		_ (%>:) л ъ; _ (%>:) л ӏ;

"д --> б before б" !Comrie et al. 2015 p. 100
д:б <=>  _ %>: б ; 

"л --> н before на" 
л:н <=>  _ %>: н а; 

"Vбо -> бо" 
Cx:0 <=> C _ %>: б о [%{UM%}: | ь:] .#.  ;
	except 
		.#. C _ %>: б о %{UM%}: .#.  ;
			where Cx in (а о е и)
			matched;

"vowel between two morphemes in verbs" 
%{L%}:и <=> X %>: _ [л | й | с] ; where X in C;

"handling vowel hiatus in verb paradigms"
Cx:0 <=> C _ ([ь: | :ь]) %>: Vowels;
	except
		C _ ([ь: | :ь]) %>: и й ā л ӏ е й;
			where Cx in (а о е и)
			matched;			
"handling vowel hiatus in verb paradigms; umlauts"
ь:0 <=> [Cx: | :Cx] _ %>: Vowels; 
	except
		C _ ([ь: | :ь]) %>: и й ā л ӏ е й;
			where Cx in (а о е и)
			matched;	

"лI, тI, цI -> ц before ц"
Cx:ц <=> _ ӏ: %>: ц;
	where Cx in (т л)
		matched;

"ӏ deletion in assimilations"
ӏ:0 <=> :ц _ %>: ц; :д _ %>: д; :ч _ %>: ч;

"тI -> д before д"
т:д <=> _ ӏ: %>: д;
